Louisiana, session 2026, HB543.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1703(A)(1) and and 1710(C) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1703. Exemptions
A. Generally. (1) Effective January 1, 1978, and thereafter, there shall be
exempt from state, parish, and special ad valorem taxes all property which is
declared to be exempt from taxation by Sections 20 and 21 of Article VII of the
Constitution and pursuant to the authority contained in Section 17 of Article VI of
the Constitution, and no other. However, the exemption for a bona fide homestead,
as defined in Subparagraph (1) of Paragraph A of Section 20 of Article VII of the
Constitution, for the years 1978 through 1981 only, and in the parish of Orleans
through 1982 only, shall be five thousand dollars of assessed valuation. Effective
on the first day in January in each parish, in the year in which the appraisal and
valuation provisions of Paragraph (F) of Section 18 of Article VII of the Constitution
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1140 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 543
of Louisiana are implemented and thereafter, the exemption, for a bona fide
homestead, exemption as defined in Section 20 of Article VII of the Constitution,
shall be seven thousand, five hundred dollars of the assessed valuation or any greater
amount authorized by a parish in accordance with the provisions of Subparagraph (1)
of Paragraph A of Section 20 of Article VII of the Constitution.
* * *
§1710. Homestead exemption; residential lessees; tax credits
* * *
C. A residential lessee shall be entitled to a credit against any ad valorem tax
imposed relative to the residence property, in an amount equal to the amount of tax
applicable on property with an assessed valuation of seven thousand five hundred
dollars up to the amount of the homestead exemption or the actual amount of tax,
whichever is less, provided the residential lessee is not otherwise entitled to the
homestead exemption.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, but only if the
proposed amendment of Article VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as House Bill No. ____ of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.